District of Columbia statutes.
4-203.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Child” means any child who comes within the purview of the Department of Human Services either because such child is neglected as defined in § 16-2301(9) or whose custody has been voluntarily surrendered by the parent or guardian to the Mayor.

(2)

“Crisis facility” shall mean any community-based residential type housing for dependent and neglected children.

(3)

“Private institution” means any privately owned or operated institution that provides care and maintenance for neglected or dependent children, or both, on a contractual basis with the Mayor.

(4)

“Public institution” shall mean Junior Village or any successor institution designed and used for such purpose.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 301, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 17(a), 32 DCR 30

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-203.1.